California statutes. Penal Code
(b) Any licensed gun dealer may transfer possession of any assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle received pursuant to subdivision (a), to a gunsmith for purposes of accomplishing service or repair of that weapon. A transfer is permissible only to the following persons:

(1) A gunsmith who is in the dealer’s employ.

(2) A gunsmith
 with whom the dealer has contracted for gunsmithing services.

(c) In order for paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) to apply, the gunsmith receiving the assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle shall hold all of the following:

(1) A dealer’s license issued pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(2) Any business license required by a state or local governmental entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31055.

In addition to the uses allowed in Article 5 (commencing with Section 30900), any licensed gun dealer who lawfully possesses an assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 30900) may do any of the following:

(a) Transport the firearm between dealers or out of the state if that person is permitted pursuant to the National Firearms Act. Any transporting allowed by this section or Section 31050 shall be done as required by Sections 16850 and 25610.

(b) Display the firearm at any gun show licensed by a state or local governmental entity.

(c) Sell the firearm
 to a resident outside the state.

(d) Sell the firearm to a person who has been issued a permit pursuant to Section 31000.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Miscellaneous Provisions [31100. - 31115.]

31100.

Any individual may arrange in advance to relinquish an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle to a police or sheriff’s department. The assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle shall be transported in accordance with Sections 16850 and 25610.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31105.

(a) No peace officer or dispatcher shall broadcast over a police radio that an individual has registered, or has obtained a permit to possess, an assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle pursuant to this chapter, unless there exists a reason to believe in good faith that one of the following conditions exist:

(1) The individual has engaged, or may be engaged, in criminal conduct.

(2) The police are responding to a call in which the person allegedly committing a criminal violation may gain access to the assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle.

(3) The victim, witness, or person who
 reported the alleged criminal violation may be using the assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle to hold the person allegedly committing the criminal violation, or may be using the weapon in defense of self or another person.

(b) This section shall not prohibit a peace officer or dispatcher from broadcasting over a police radio that an individual has not registered, or has not obtained a permit to possess, an assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle pursuant to this chapter.

(c) This section does not limit the transmission of an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle ownership status via law enforcement computers or any other medium that is legally accessible only to peace officers or other authorized personnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31110.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the Department of Justice shall, for every person to whom a permit is issued pursuant to this article, annually conduct an inspection for security and safe storage purposes, and to reconcile the inventory of assault weapons.

(b) A person, firm, or corporation with an inventory of fewer than five devices that require any Department of Justice permit shall be subject to an inspection for security and safe storage purposes, and to reconcile inventory, once every five years, or more frequently if determined by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 729, Sec. 3.   (AB 170)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

31115.

(a) The Department of Justice shall conduct a public education and notification program regarding the registration of assault weapons and the definition of the weapons set forth in Section 30515 and former Section 12276.1, as it read at any time from when it was added by Section 7 of Chapter 129 of the Statutes of 1999 to when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010.

(b) The public education and notification program shall include outreach to local law enforcement agencies and utilization of public service announcements in a variety of media approaches, to ensure maximum publicity of the limited forgiveness period of the registration requirement specified in subdivision
 (f) of former Section 12285, as that subdivision read in Section 5 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991, and the consequences of nonregistration. The department shall develop posters describing gunowners’ responsibilities under former Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 12275) of Title 2 of Part 4, as that chapter read when the forgiveness period commenced on January 1, 1992, which shall be posted in a conspicuous place in every licensed gun store in the state during the forgiveness period.

(c) For .50 BMG rifles, the department’s education campaign shall provide materials to dealers of .50 BMG rifles, and to recognized national associations that specialize in .50 BMG rifles.

(d) Any costs incurred by the Department of Justice to implement this section, which cannot be absorbed by the department, shall be funded from the Dealers’ Record of Sale Special Account, as set forth in
 Section 28235, or former Section 12076 as it read at any time from when it was amended by Section 1.7 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991 to when it was repealed by Section 12 of Chapter 606 of the Statutes of 1993, or former Section 12076 as it read at any time from when it was enacted by Section 13 of Chapter 606 of the Statutes of 1993 to when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Body Armor [31310. - 31360.]

31310.

No body armor shall be acquired by the commissioner pursuant to Section 2259.5 of the Vehicle Code unless, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 31315, the Department of Justice has certified the body armor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31315.

(a) Before any body armor may be purchased for use by state peace officers, the Department of Justice, after consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall establish minimum ballistic performance standards, and shall determine that the armor satisfies those standards.

(b) Only body armor that meets state requirements under subdivision (a) for acquisition or purchase shall be eligible for testing for certification under the ballistic performance standards established by the Department of Justice.

(c) Only body armor that is certified as acceptable by the department shall be purchased for use by state peace
 officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 241.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

31320.

(a) Any person engaged in the manufacture or sale of body armor may apply to the Department of Justice for certification that a particular type of body armor manufactured or sold by that person is acceptable.

(b) The applicant shall reimburse the state for any actual expenses incurred by the state in testing and certifying a particular type of body armor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31325.

Any application submitted pursuant to Section 31320 shall contain all of the following:

(a) Full written reports of any investigation conducted for the purpose of determining whether the body armor is acceptable.

(b) A full written statement of the design of the body armor.

(c) A full written statement of the methods used in, and the facilities and controls used for, the manufacture of the body armor.

(d) Any samples of the body armor and its components as the Department of Justice may require.

(e) Specimens of the instructions and advertisements used or proposed to be used for the body armor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31330.

The Department of Justice, in cooperation with the office of procurement of the Department of General Services, shall establish a schedule for ballistic testing for certification pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 31315.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31335.

The Department of Justice shall issue an order refusing to certify a body armor as acceptable if, after due notice to the applicant, the department finds any of the following:

(a) That the body armor does not satisfy the ballistic performance standards established by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 31315.

(b) That the application contains any misrepresentation of a material fact.

(c) That the application is materially incomplete.

(d) That the applicant has failed to reimburse the state as required by
 Section 31320.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31340.

The Department of Justice shall issue an order revoking certification of a body armor if, after due notice to the applicant, the department finds any of the following:

(a) The experience or additional testing show that the body armor does not comply with the department’s ballistic performance standards.

(b) The application contains any misrepresentation of a material fact.

(c) The body armor must be retested for certification under new department standards.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31345.

(a) All purchases of certified body armor under the provisions of this chapter shall be made by the Department of General Services on behalf of an authorized state agency or department. Purchases of body armor shall be based upon written requests submitted by an authorized state agency or department to the Department of General Services.

(b) The Department of General Services shall make certified body armor available to peace officers of the Department of Justice, as defined by Section 830.3, while engaged in law enforcement activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31350.

The Department of General Services shall, pursuant to departmental regulation, after consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, define the term “enforcement activities” for purposes of this chapter, and develop standards regarding what constitutes sufficient wear on body armor to necessitate replacement of the body armor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31355.

The Department of Justice shall adopt and promulgate regulations for the fair and efficient enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31360.

(a) A person who has been convicted of a violent felony under the laws of the United States, the State of California, or any other state, government, or country, who purchases, owns, or possesses body armor, as defined in Section 16288, except as authorized under subdivision (c), is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment in state prison for 16 months, or two or three years.

(b) (1) A person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm under the laws of this state, except under Section 29610, who purchases, owns, or possesses body armor, as defined in Section 16288,
 except as authorized under subdivision (c), is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) Upon advising a person of their firearm prohibition, a court shall also advise them of their body armor prohibition pursuant to this section. A person shall relinquish any body armor in their possession.

(c) A person whose employment, livelihood, or safety is dependent on the ability to legally possess and use body armor, who is subject to the prohibition imposed by subdivision (a) due to a prior violent felony conviction, or who is prohibited pursuant to subdivision (b), may file a petition for an exception to this prohibition with the chief of police or county sheriff of the jurisdiction in which that person seeks to possess and use the body armor. The chief of police or sheriff may reduce or eliminate
 the prohibition, impose conditions on reduction or elimination of the prohibition, or otherwise grant relief from the prohibition as the chief of police or sheriff deems appropriate, based on the following:

(1) A finding that the petitioner is likely to use body armor in a safe and lawful manner.

(2) A finding that the petitioner has a reasonable need for this type of protection under the circumstances.

In making its decision, the chief of police or sheriff shall consider the petitioner’s continued employment, the interests of justice, any relevant evidence, and the totality of the circumstances. It is the intent of the Legislature that law enforcement officials exercise broad discretion in fashioning appropriate relief under this paragraph
 in cases in which relief is warranted. However, this paragraph may not be construed to require law enforcement officials to grant relief to any particular petitioner. Relief from this prohibition does not relieve any other person or entity from any liability that might otherwise be imposed.

(d) The chief of police or sheriff shall require, as a condition of granting an exception under subdivision (c), that the petitioner agree to maintain on the petitioner’s person a certified copy of the law enforcement official’s permission to possess and use body armor, including any conditions or limitations.

(e) Law enforcement officials who enforce the prohibition specified in subdivision (a) or (b) against a person who has been granted relief pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be immune from any
 liability for false arrest arising from the enforcement of this subdivision unless the person has in possession a certified copy of the permission granting the person relief from the prohibition, as required by subdivision (d). This immunity from liability does not relieve any person or entity from any other liability that might otherwise be imposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 232, Sec. 1.   (AB 92)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Handguns and Firearm Safety [31500. - 32110.]



  ARTICLE 1. Unconventional Pistol [31500. - 31590.]

31500.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any person in this state who manufactures or causes to be manufactured, imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives, lends, or possesses any unconventional pistol is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 106.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

31590.

Except as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 2 of Title 2, any unconventional pistol is a nuisance and is subject to Section 18010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Firearm Safety Certificate [31610. - 31670.]

31610.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to require that persons who obtain firearms have a basic familiarity with those firearms, including, but not limited to, the safe handling and storage of those firearms. It is not the intent of the Legislature to require a firearm safety certificate for the mere possession of a firearm.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 14) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 761, Sec. 15.   (SB 683)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

31615.

(a) A person shall not do either of the following:

(1) Purchase or receive any firearm, except an antique firearm, without a valid firearm safety certificate, except that in the case of a handgun, an unexpired handgun safety certificate may be used.

(2) Sell, deliver, loan, or transfer any firearm, except an antique firearm, to any person who does not have a valid firearm safety certificate, except that in the case of a handgun, an unexpired handgun safety certificate may be used.

(b) Any person who violates subdivision (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) The provisions of this section are cumulative, and shall not be construed as restricting the application of any other law. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by different provisions of this code shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 16) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 761, Sec. 17.   (SB 683)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

31620.

(a) A person shall not commit an act of collusion as specified in Section 27550.

(b) Any person who alters, counterfeits, or falsifies a handgun safety certificate, or who uses or attempts to use any altered, counterfeited, or falsified handgun safety certificate to purchase a handgun, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) Commencing January 1, 2015, any person who alters, counterfeits, or falsifies a firearm safety certificate, or who uses or attempts to use any altered, counterfeited, or falsified firearm safety certificate to purchase a firearm, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) The provisions of this section are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting the application of any other law. However, an act or omission punishable in different ways by this section and different provisions of this code shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 761, Sec. 18.   (SB 683)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

31625.

(a) A certified instructor shall not issue a firearm safety certificate to any person who has not complied with this article. Proof of compliance shall be forwarded to the department by certified instructors as frequently as the department may determine.

(b) A certified instructor shall not issue a firearm safety certificate to any person who is under 18 years of age.

(c) A violation of this section shall be grounds for the department to revoke the instructor’s certification to issue firearm safety certificates.

(d) This section shall become
 operative on January 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 19) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 761, Sec. 20.   (SB 683)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

31630.

(a) The department shall develop an instruction manual in English, Spanish, traditional Chinese, simplified Chinese, Tagalog, Vietnamese, Korean, Dari, and Armenian. The department shall make the instruction manual available to firearm dealers licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, who shall make it available to the general public. Essential portions of the manual may be included in the pamphlet described in Section 34205.

(b) The department shall develop audiovisual materials in the languages described in subdivision (a) to be issued to instructors certified by the department.

(c) The department shall
 solicit input from any reputable association or organization, including any law enforcement association that has as one of its objectives the promotion of firearm safety, in the development of the firearm safety certificate instructional materials.

(d) The instruction manual shall prominently include the following firearm safety warning:

Firearms must be handled responsibly and securely stored to prevent access by children and other unauthorized users. California has strict laws pertaining to firearms, and you can be fined or imprisoned if you fail to comply with them. Visit the website of the California Attorney General at https://oag.ca.gov/firearms for information on firearm laws applicable to you and how you can comply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (AB 724)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

31635.

(a) The department shall prescribe a minimum level of skill, knowledge, and competency to be required of all firearm safety certificate instructors.

(b) Department Certified Instructor applicants shall have a certification to provide training from one of the following organizations, as specified, or any entity found by the department to give comparable instruction in firearms safety, or the applicant shall have similar or equivalent training to that provided by the following, as determined by the department:

(1) Department of Consumer Affairs, State of California-Firearm Training Instructor.

(2) Director of Civilian Marksmanship, Instructor or Rangemaster.

(3) Federal Government, Certified Rangemaster or Firearm Instructor.

(4) Federal Law Enforcement Training Center, Firearm Instructor Training Program or Rangemaster.

(5) United States Military, Military Occupational Specialty (MOS) as marksmanship or firearms instructor. Assignment as Range Officer or Safety Officer is not sufficient.

(6) National Rifle Association-Certified Instructor, Law Enforcement Instructor, Rangemaster, or Training Counselor.

(7) Commission on
 Peace Officer Standards and Training (POST), State of California-Firearm Instructor or Rangemaster.

(8) Authorization from a State of California accredited school to teach a firearm training course.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 23) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 761, Sec. 24.   (SB 683)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

31640.

(a) The department shall develop a written objective test, in English, Spanish, traditional Chinese, simplified Chinese, Tagalog, Vietnamese, Korean, Dari, and Armenian, and prescribe its content, form, and manner, to be administered by an instructor certified by the department.

(b) If the person taking the test is unable to read, the test shall be administered orally. If the person taking the test is unable to read any of the languages described in subdivision (a), the test may be administered orally by a translator.

(c) The test shall cover, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The laws applicable to carrying and handling firearms, particularly handguns.

(2) The responsibilities of ownership of firearms, particularly handguns.

(3) Current law as it relates to the private sale and transfer of firearms.

(4) Current law as it relates to the permissible use of lethal force.

(5) What constitutes safe firearm storage.

(6) The reasons for and risks of owning a firearm and bringing a firearm into the home, including the increased risk of death to someone in the household by suicide, homicide, or unintentional
 injury.

(7) Prevention strategies to address the risks associated with bringing firearms into the home.

(8) Current law as it relates to eligibility to own or possess a firearm, gun violence restraining orders, domestic violence restraining orders, and privately manufactured firearms.

(d) Commencing January 1, 2019, the test shall require the applicant to be provided with, and acknowledge receipt of, the following warning information:

(1) “Firearms must be handled responsibly and securely stored to prevent access by children and other unauthorized users. California has strict laws pertaining to firearms and you can be fined or imprisoned if you fail to comply
 with them. Visit the website of the California Attorney General at https://oag.ca.gov/firearms for information on firearm laws applicable to you and how you can comply.”

(2) “If you decide to sell or give your firearm to someone, you must generally complete a ‘Dealer Record of Sale (DROS)’ form and conduct the transfer through a licensed firearms dealer. Remember, it is generally a crime to transfer a firearm without first filling out this form. If the police recover a firearm that was involved in a crime, the firearm’s previous owner may be prosecuted if the previous owner did not fill out the DROS form. Please make sure you go to a licensed firearms dealer and fill out that form if you want to sell or give away your firearm.”

(3) “If you or someone you know is contemplating
 suicide, please call the national suicide prevention lifeline at 1-800-273-TALK (8255).”

(e) (1) The department shall update test materials related to this article at least once every five years.

(2) The department shall update the internet website referenced in subdivision (d) regularly to reflect current laws and regulations.

(f) A dealer licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, or an employee, or a managing officer or partner certified as an instructor pursuant to this article, shall designate a separate room or partitioned area for a person to take the objective test, and maintain adequate supervision to ensure that no acts of collusion occur while the objective test is being
 administered.

(g) The department shall update the test to reflect amendments
 to subdivision (c) made by the act that added this subdivision during the first regularly scheduled update of the test required pursuant to subdivision (e) that occurs after January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 248, Sec. 2.5.   (AB 1598)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

31641.

(a) The Department of Justice shall prepare a firearm safety certificate study guide in all of the languages described in subdivision (a) of Section 31640 that explains the information covered in the test in Section 31640.

(b) The department shall offer copies of the study guide at actual cost to a firearm safety instructor certified pursuant to Section 31635, who shall provide the study guide to an applicant for a firearm safety certificate pursuant to Section 31645 prior to their test date. The study guide may be provided as an electronic copy by text or email or as a physical copy. The cost of the study guide, if any, may be added to the fee described in Section 31650.

(c) The department shall update the study guide concurrently with an update to the test in Section 31640.

(d) The department shall notify a certified instructor of the requirement to provide the study guide to an applicant for a firearm safety certificate in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 248, Sec. 3.5.   (AB 1598)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

31645.

(a) An applicant for a firearm safety certificate shall successfully pass the objective test referred to in Section 31640, with a passing grade of at least 75 percent. Any person receiving a passing grade on the objective test shall immediately be issued a firearm safety certificate by the instructor, provided that, commencing January 1, 2019, the applicant has acknowledged receipt of the firearm safety warning required by subdivision (d) of Section 31640.

(b) An applicant who fails to pass the objective test upon the first attempt shall be offered additional instructional materials by the instructor, such as a videotape or booklet. The person may not retake the objective test
 under any circumstances until 24 hours have elapsed after the failure to pass the objective test upon the first attempt. The person failing the test on the first attempt shall take another version of the test upon the second attempt. All tests shall be taken from the same instructor except upon permission by the department, which shall be granted only for good cause shown. The instructor shall make himself or herself available to the applicant during regular business hours in order to retake the test.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 825, Sec. 6.   (AB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

31650.

(a) The certified instructor may charge a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25), fifteen dollars ($15) of which is to be paid to the department pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) An applicant to renew a firearm safety certificate shall be required to pass the objective test. The certified instructor may charge a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25), fifteen dollars ($15) of which is to be forwarded to the department pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) The department may charge the certified instructor up to fifteen dollars ($15) for each firearm safety certificate issued by that instructor to cover the department’s cost in
 carrying out and enforcing this article, and enforcing the provisions listed in subdivision (e), as determined annually by the department.

(d) All money received by the department pursuant to this article shall be deposited into the Firearms Safety and Enforcement Special Fund created pursuant to Section 28300.

(e) The department shall conduct enforcement activities, including, but not limited to, law enforcement activities to ensure compliance with the following provisions:

(1) Section 830.95.

(2) Title 2 (commencing with Section 12001) of Part 4.

(3) This part, except Sections 16965, 17235, and
 21510.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 29) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 761, Sec. 30.   (SB 683)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

31655.

(a) The department shall develop firearm safety certificates to be issued by instructors certified by the department to those persons who have complied with this article.

(b) A firearm safety certificate shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(1) A unique firearm safety certificate identification number.

(2) The holder’s full name.

(3) The holder’s date of birth.

(4) The holder’s driver’s license or
 identification number.

(5) The holder’s signature.

(6) The signature of the issuing instructor.

(7) The date of issuance.

(c) The firearm safety certificate shall expire five years after the date that it was issued by the certified instructor.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 31) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 761, Sec. 32.   (SB 683)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

31660.

(a) In the case of loss or destruction of a firearm safety certificate, the issuing instructor shall issue a duplicate certificate upon request and proof of identification to the certificate holder.

(b) In the case of loss or destruction of a handgun safety certificate, the issuing instructor shall issue a duplicate certificate upon request and proof of identification to the certificate holder, which shall be valid only for the balance of the unexpired term of the original certificate.

(c) The department may authorize the issuing instructor to charge a fee, not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15), for a duplicate certificate.
 Revenues from this fee shall be deposited in the Firearms Safety and Enforcement Special Fund created pursuant to Section 28300.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 33) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 761, Sec. 34.   (SB 683)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative January 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

31665.

The department shall be immune from any liability arising from implementing Sections 31630, 31635, 31640, and subdivision (a) of Section 31655.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

31670.

Except for the provisions of former Section 12804, former Article 8 (commencing with Section 12800) of Chapter 6 of Title 2 of Part 4, as added by Section 10 of Chapter 942 of the Statutes of 2001, became operative on January 1, 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exceptions to Firearm Safety Certificate Requirement [31700. - 31835.]

31700.

(a) The following persons, properly identified, are exempted from the firearm safety certificate requirement in subdivision (a) of Section 31615:

(1) Any active or honorably retired peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2.

(2) Any active or honorably retired federal officer or law enforcement agent.

(3) Any reserve peace officer, as defined in Section 832.6.

(4) Any person who has successfully completed the course of training specified in Section 832.

(5) A
 firearms dealer licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, who is acting in the course and scope of that person’s activities as a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive.

(6) A federally licensed collector who is acquiring or being loaned a firearm that is a curio or relic, as defined in Section 478.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, who has a current certificate of eligibility issued by the department pursuant to Section 26710.

(7) Except as provided in subdivision (d), a person to whom a firearm is being returned, where the person receiving the firearm is the owner of the firearm.

(8) A family member of a peace officer or deputy sheriff from a local agency who receives a firearm pursuant to Section 50081 of the Government Code.

(9) Any individual who has a valid concealed weapons permit issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 26150) of Division 5.

(10) An active or honorably retired member of the United States Armed Forces, the National Guard, the Air National Guard, or the active reserve components of the United States, where individuals in those organizations are properly identified. For purposes of this section, proper identification includes the Armed Forces Identification Card, the Veteran Health Identification Card issued by the Department of Veterans Affairs, or other written documentation certifying that the individual is an active or honorably retired member.

(11) Any person who is authorized to carry loaded firearms pursuant to Section 26025 or 26030.

(12) Persons who are the holders of a special weapons permit issued by the department pursuant to Section 32650 or 33300, pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 18900) of Chapter 1 of Division 5 of Title 2, or pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 32700) of Chapter 6 of this division.

(b) The following persons who take title or possession of a firearm by operation of law in a representative capacity, until or unless they transfer title ownership of the firearm to themselves in a personal capacity, are exempted from the firearm safety certificate requirement in subdivision (a) of Section 31615:

(1) The executor, personal representative, or
 administrator of an estate.

(2) A secured creditor or an agent or employee thereof when the firearms are possessed as collateral for, or as a result of, a default under a security agreement under the Commercial Code.

(3) A levying officer, as defined in Section 481.140, 511.060, or 680.260 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(4) A receiver performing the functions of a receiver.

(5) A trustee in bankruptcy performing the duties of a trustee.

(6) An assignee for the benefit of creditors performing the functions of an assignee.

(7) The trustee of a trust that includes a firearm and that was part of a will that created the
 trust.

(8) A person acting pursuant to the person’s power of attorney in accordance with Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Probate Code.

(9) A limited or general conservator appointed by a court pursuant to the Probate Code or Welfare and Institutions Code.

(10) A guardian ad litem appointed by a court pursuant to Section 372 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(11) The trustee of a trust that includes a firearm that is under court supervision.

(12) A special administrator appointed by a court pursuant to Section 8540 of the Probate Code.

(13) A guardian appointed by a court pursuant to Section 1500 of the
 Probate Code.

(c) A person, 18 years of age or older, validly identified, who has been issued a valid hunting license that is unexpired is exempt from the firearm safety certificate requirement in subdivision (a) of Section 31615, except as to handguns.

(d) A person who takes possession of a firearm and complies with Section 27922 by delivering the firearm to a law enforcement agency is exempted from the firearm safety certificate requirement in subdivision (a) of Section 31615. The exemption set forth in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) shall not apply to the return of that firearm to that person, if the person has requested the firearm and is eligible to receive it.

(e) The firearm safety certificate requirement in subdivision (a) of Section 31615 shall not apply to a person taking possession of a firearm pursuant
 to Section 27882 or 27883.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 146, Sec. 1.   (AB 1982)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

31705.
